fi: Koulutuksen painopiste: Ketteryys; Ketteryys ja nopeus; Tasapaino ja vakaus; Pallonhallinta; Pallon suojaus ja ote; Esto ja taklaus; Sydän- ja verenkiertoelimistön kestävyys; Kiinniotto; Keskivartalon harjoittelu; Kenttäpeli; Lipun ryöstö; Liikkuvuus; Jalkatyö; Yleiskunto; Maalivahtipeli; Puristusvoima; Otepidon parantaminen; Puristus-/käsivoima; Lyönti; Potkiminen ja lentopotkut; Monitaito; Tuomarointi; Syöttäminen; Syöttäminen; Reaktio; Reaktioaika; Vastaanotto ja kiinniotto; Laukominen; Aloitussyöttö; Erikoisjoukkueet; Nopeus ja ketteryys; Voimaharjoittelu; Voima- ja fysiikkaharjoittelu; Voima ja vastus; Muu
en: Training focus: Agility; Agility and speed; Balance & Stability; Ball control; Ball security and grip; Blocking and tackling; Cardiovascular Endurance; Catching; Core Conditioning; Fielding; Flag pulling; Flexibility; Footwork; General Fitness; Goalkeeping; Grip Strength; Grip enhancement; Grip/hand strength; Hitting; Kicking and punting; Multi-skill; Officiating/Referee; Passing; Pitching; Reaction; Reaction Time; Receiving and catching; Shooting; Snapping; Special teams; Speed & Agility; Strength Training; Strength and conditioning; Strength and resistance; Other
hu: Képzési terület: Agilitás; Agilitás és gyorsaság; Egyensúly és stabilitás; Labdakezelés; Labdabiztonság és fogás; Blokkolás és szerelés; Szív- és érrendszeri állóképesség; Elkapás; Törzsizomzat erősítése; Mezőnyjáték; Zászlótépés; Hajlékonyság; Lábmunka; Általános erőnlét; Kapusmunka; Szorítóerő; Fogásjavítás; Szorítás/kézerő; Ütés; Rúgás és puntolás; Többféle készség; Játékvezetés/bírói munka; Passzolás; Dobás; Reakció; Reakcióidő; Fogadás és elkapás; Lövés; Snappelés; Speciális csapatok; Gyorsaság és agilitás; Erőedzés; Erő- és állóképesség; Erő és ellenállás; Egyéb
sl-SI: Fokus treninga: Agilnost; Agilnost in hitrost; Ravnotežje in stabilnost; Nadzor nad žogo; Zaščita in oprijem žoge; Blokiranje in ustavljanje; Kardiovaskularna vzdržljivost; Lovljenje; Krepitev trupa; Lovljenje v polju; Vlečenje zastavice; Gibljivost; Delo nog; Splošna telesna pripravljenost; Vratarstvo; Moč oprijema; Izboljšanje oprijema; Moč oprijema/roke; Udarjanje; Brcanje in izbijanje; Več spretnosti; Sojenje; Podajanje; Metanje; Reakcija; Reakcijski čas; Sprejemanje in lovljenje; Streljanje; Podaja nazaj (snapping); Posebne ekipe; Hitrost in agilnost; Vadba za moč; Moč in kondicija; Moč in upor; Drugo
nb: Treningsfokus: Smidighet; Smidighet og fart; Balanse og stabilitet; Ballkontroll; Ballbeskyttelse og grep; Blokkering og takling; Kondisjon; Mottak; Kjernetrening; Fielding; Flaggtrekking; Bevegelighet; Fotarbeid; Generell form; Keepertrening; Grepsstyrke; Grepsforbedring; Grep-/håndstyrke; Slag; Sparking og punting; Flere ferdigheter; Dømming/dommer; Pasninger; Pitching; Reaksjon; Reaksjonstid; Mottak og griping; Skyting; Snapping; Special teams; Fart og smidighet; Styrketrening; Styrke og kondisjon; Styrke og motstand; Annet
es: Enfoque del entrenamiento: Agilidad; Agilidad y velocidad; Equilibrio y estabilidad; Control del balón; Seguridad y agarre del balón; Bloqueo y tacleo; Resistencia cardiovascular; Recepción; Acondicionamiento del core; Fildeo; Robo de bandera; Flexibilidad; Juego de pies; Acondicionamiento físico general; Portería; Fuerza de agarre; Mejora de agarre; Agarre/fuerza de manos; Bateo; Pateo y despeje; Multihabilidad; Arbitraje/Árbitro; Pases; Lanzamiento; Reacción; Tiempo de reacción; Recepción y atrapadas; Tiro; Centros; Equipos especiales; Velocidad y agilidad; Entrenamiento de fuerza; Fuerza y acondicionamiento; Fuerza y resistencia; Otro
zh-CN: 训练重点: 敏捷度; 敏捷度与速度; 平衡与稳定性; 控球; 护球与抓球; 阻挡与拦截; 心血管耐力; 接球; 核心体能; 守备; 拔旗; 柔韧性; 步法; 综合健身; 守门; 抓握力; 抓握力强化; 抓握/手部力量; 击球; 踢球与弃踢; 多项技能; 执裁/裁判; 传球; 投球; 反应; 反应时间; 传接与接球; 射门/投篮; 开球; 特勤组; 速度与敏捷度; 力量训练; 力量与体能; 力量与阻力; 其他
ru: Направленность тренировки: Ловкость; Ловкость и скорость; Равновесие и устойчивость; Контроль мяча; Удержание и захват мяча; Блокировка и отбор; Сердечно-сосудистая выносливость; Ловля; Укрепление мышц кора; Филдинг (игра в поле); Срывание флага; Гибкость; Работа ног; Общая физическая подготовка; Вратарское мастерство; Сила хвата; Улучшение хвата; Сила хвата/кисти; Удары; Удары по мячу; Развитие нескольких навыков; Судейство; Передача; Питчинг; Реакция; Время реакции; Прием и ловля; Броски/удары по воротам; Снэпы (подача мяча); Спецкоманды; Скорость и ловкость; Силовые тренировки; ОФП и силовая подготовка; Сила и сопротивление; Другое
pl: Zakres szkoleniowy: Zwinność; Zwinność i szybkość; Równowaga i stabilność; Kontrola nad piłką; Utrzymanie i chwyt piłki; Blokowanie i szarżowanie; Wytrzymałość sercowo-naczyniowa; Chwytanie; Wzmocnienie mięśni głębokich (core); Obrona w polu (fielding); Zrywanie flag; Elastyczność; Praca nóg; Sprawność ogólna; Bramkarstwo; Siła chwytu; Poprawa chwytu; Siła chwytu / rąk; Uderzanie; Kopanie; Wielofunkcyjne; Sędziowanie; Podawanie; Narzucanie (pitching); Reakcja; Czas reakcji; Odbieranie i chwytanie; Strzelanie; Podawanie do tyłu (snapping); Formacje specjalne; Szybkość i zwinność; Trening siłowy; Siła i kondycja; Siła i opór; Inne
nl: Trainingsfocus: Behendigheid; Behendigheid en snelheid; Balans & stabiliteit; Balcontrole; Balveiligheid en grip; Blokkeren en tackelen; Cardiovasculair uithoudingsvermogen; Vangen; Core-training; Veldspel; Vlag afpakken; Flexibiliteit; Voetenwerk; Algemene conditie; Keepen; Gripkracht; Gripverbetering; Grip-/handkracht; Slaan; Trappen en puntschoppen; Meerdere vaardigheden; Scheidsrechteren; Passen; Pitchen; Reactie; Reactietijd; Ontvangen en vangen; Schieten; Snappen; Special teams; Snelheid & behendigheid; Krachttraining; Kracht en conditie; Kracht en weerstand; Overig
el: Εστίαση προπόνησης: Ευελιξία; Ευελιξία και ταχύτητα; Ισορροπία & Σταθερότητα; Έλεγχος μπάλας; Κράτημα και ασφάλεια μπάλας; Μπλοκ και τάκλιν; Καρδιαγγειακή αντοχή; Πιάσιμο; Ενδυνάμωση κορμού; Υποδοχή/Άμυνα; Τράβηγμα σημαίας; Ευλυγισία; Κίνηση ποδιών; Γενική φυσική κατάσταση; Υπεράσπιση τέρματος; Δύναμη λαβής; Βελτίωση λαβής; Δύναμη λαβής/χεριού; Χτύπημα; Λάκτισμα και σουτ; Πολλαπλές δεξιότητες; Διαιτησία/Διαιτητής; Πάσα; Ρίψη; Αντίδραση; Χρόνος αντίδρασης; Υποδοχή και πιάσιμο; Σουτ; Snapping; Ειδικές ομάδες; Ταχύτητα & Ευελιξία; Προπόνηση ενδυνάμωσης; Ενδυνάμωση και φυσική κατάσταση; Δύναμη και αντίσταση; Άλλο
pt-PT: Foco do treino: Agilidade; Agilidade e velocidade; Equilíbrio e estabilidade; Controlo de bola; Segurança e aderência da bola; Bloqueio e desarme; Resistência cardiovascular; Apanhar; Condicionamento do core; Trabalho de campo (fielding); Puxar a bandeira; Flexibilidade; Trabalho de pés; Aptidão física geral; Defesa da baliza; Força de preensão; Melhoria da preensão; Força de preensão/mão; Batida; Pontapé e chuto; Multicompetência; Arbitragem; Passe; Lançamento (pitching); Reação; Tempo de reação; Receção e apanha; Remate; Passe para trás (snapping); Equipas especiais; Velocidade e agilidade; Treino de força; Força e condicionamento; Força e resistência; Outro
fr: Axe d’entraînement: Agilité; Agilité et vitesse; Équilibre et stabilité; Contrôle de la balle; Protection et prise de balle; Blocage et plaquage; Endurance cardiovasculaire; Réception; Gainage; Jeu sur le terrain; Tirage de drapeau; Souplesse; Jeu de jambes; Conditionnement physique général; Gardien de but; Force de préhension; Amélioration de la préhension; Force de préhension/des mains; Frappe; Coups de pied et dégagements; Compétences multiples; Arbitrage; Passes; Lancer; Réaction; Temps de réaction; Réception et attrapé; Tir; Remise; Unités spéciales; Vitesse et agilité; Musculation; Force et conditionnement; Force et résistance; Autre
vi: Trọng tâm đào tạo: Nhanh nhẹn; Nhanh nhẹn và tốc độ; Cân bằng & Ổn định; Kiểm soát bóng; Giữ bóng và bám dính; Chắn và tắc bóng; Sức bền tim mạch; Bắt bóng; Rèn luyện cơ cốt lõi; Bắt bóng trên sân; Giật cờ; Độ linh hoạt; Kỹ thuật di chuyển bước chân; Thể lực chung; Bắt gôn; Sức mạnh lực nắm; Tăng cường độ bám dính; Lực nắm/cổ tay; Đánh bóng; Sút và đá bóng bổng; Đa kỹ năng; Điều hành/Trọng tài; Chuyền bóng; Ném bóng; Phản xạ; Thời gian phản xạ; Nhận và bắt bóng; Ném bóng; Đưa bóng; Đội đặc nhiệm; Tốc độ & Nhanh nhẹn; Luyện tập sức mạnh; Sức mạnh và thể lực; Sức mạnh và sức cản; Khác
tr: Eğitim odağı: Çeviklik; Çeviklik ve hız; Denge ve stabilite; Top kontrolü; Top güvenliği ve kavrama; Bloklama ve müdahale; Kardiyovasküler dayanıklılık; Yakalama; Merkez bölge kondisyonu; Top karşılama; Bayrak çekme; Esneklik; Ayak çalışması; Genel fitness; Kalecilik; Kavrama gücü; Kavrama geliştirme; Kavrama/el gücü; Vuruş; Vuruş ve degaj; Çoklu beceri; Hakemlik; Pas verme; Atıcılık; Tepki; Tepki süresi; Top alma ve yakalama; Şut çekme; Top çıkarma; Özel takımlar; Hız ve çeviklik; Güç antrenmanı; Güç ve kondisyon; Güç ve direnç; Diğer
sv: Träningsfokus: Smidighet; Smidighet och hastighet; Balans och stabilitet; Bollkontroll; Bollsäkerhet och grepp; Blockering och tackling; Kardiovaskulär uthållighet; Fånga; Bålträning; Fältspel; Flaggdragning; Flexibilitet; Fotarbete; Allmän kondition; Målvaktsspel; Greppstyrka; Greppförbättring; Grepp-/handstyrka; Slag; Sparkar och utsparkar; Multiträning; Domarskap/domare; Passningar; Pitching; Reaktion; Reaktionstid; Mottagning och fångande; Skott; Snapping; Special teams; Hastighet och smidighet; Styrketräning; Styrka och kondition; Styrka och motstånd; Övrigt
ko: 훈련 중점 사항: 민첩성; 민첩성 및 스피드; 균형 및 안정성; 볼 컨트롤; 볼 안전 및 그립; 블로킹 및 태클; 심혈관 지구력; 캐칭; 코어 컨디셔닝; 수비; 플래그 풀링; 유연성; 풋워크; 일반 피트니스; 골키핑; 악력; 그립 강화; 그립/손 악력; 타격; 킥 및 펀트; 멀티 스킬; 심판/레퍼리; 패스; 피칭; 반응; 반응 속도; 리시브 및 캐칭; 슈팅; 스냅; 스페셜 팀; 스피드 및 민첩성; 근력 운동; 근력 및 컨디셔닝; 근력 및 저항; 기타
zh-TW: 訓練重點: 敏捷度; 敏捷與速度; 平衡與穩定度; 控球; 護球與抓握; 阻擋與擒抱; 心肺耐力; 接球; 核心訓練; 守備; 拔旗; 柔軟度; 步法; 一般體適能; 守門; 握力; 提升握力; 握力/手部力量; 打擊; 踢球與棄踢; 綜合技能; 執法/裁判; 傳球; 投球; 反應能力; 反應時間; 接球; 射門/投籃; 開球; 特勤組; 速度與敏捷度; 肌力訓練; 體能與肌力; 肌力與阻力; 其他
pt-BR: Treinamento foco: Agilidade; Agilidade e velocidade; Equilíbrio e estabilidade; Controle de bola; Segurança e aderência da bola; Bloqueio e desarme; Resistência cardiovascular; Recepção; Condicionamento de core; Defesa de campo; Puxar a bandeira; Flexibilidade; Trabalho de pés; Condicionamento físico geral; Defesa de goleiro; Força de preensão; Melhoria de preensão; Força de preensão/das mãos; Rebatida; Chute e punt; Multihabilidades; Arbitragem/Árbitro; Passe; Arremesso; Reação; Tempo de reação; Recebimento e captura; Arremesso; Snapping; Equipes especiais; Velocidade e agilidade; Treinamento de força; Força e condicionamento; Força e resistência; Outro
th: จุดเน้นของการฝึกอบรม: ความคล่องตัว; ความคล่องตัวและความเร็ว; ความสมดุลและความมั่นคง; การควบคุมลูก; ความปลอดภัยและการจับลูก; การบล็อกและการสกัด; ความทนทานของระบบหัวใจและหลอดเลือด; การรับ; การฝึกกล้ามเนื้อแกนกลาง; การรับลูก; การดึงธง; ความยืดหยุ่น; ฟุตเวิร์ค; ฟิตเนสทั่วไป; การรักษาประตู; ความแข็งแรงในการจับ; การเพิ่มประสิทธิภาพการจับ; ความแข็งแรงในการจับ/มือ; การตี; การเตะและการพั้นท์; หลายทักษะ; การตัดสิน/กรรมการ; การส่งลูก; การขว้างลูก; ปฏิกิริยา; เวลาตอบสนอง; การรับลูกและจับลูก; การยิง; การสแนป; ทีมพิเศษ; ความเร็วและความคล่องตัว; การฝึกความแข็งแรง; ความแข็งแรงและปรับสภาพร่างกาย; ความแข็งแรงและแรงต้าน; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Fokus treninga: Okretnost; Okretnost i brzina; Ravnoteža i stabilnost; Kontrola lopte; Zadržavanje i hvatanje lopte; Blokiranje i obaranje; Kardiovaskularna izdržljivost; Hvatanje; Jačanje trupa; Hvatanje u polju; Povlačenje zastavice; Fleksibilnost; Rad nogu; Opća kondicija; Branjenje; Snaga hvata; Poboljšanje hvata; Snaga hvata / šake; Udaranje; Udaranje i ispucavanje nogom; Više vještina; Suđenje; Dodavanje; Bacanje; Reakcija; Vrijeme reakcije; Primanje i hvatanje; Pucanje; Dodavanje unazad; Specijalni timovi; Brzina i okretnost; Trening snage; Snaga i kondicija; Snaga i otpor; Ostalo
it: Focus dell'allenamento: Agilità; Agilità e velocità; Equilibrio e stabilità; Controllo della palla; Sicurezza e presa della palla; Blocco e placcaggio; Resistenza cardiovascolare; Ricezione; Potenziamento del core; Fielding; Flag pulling; Flessibilità; Gioco di gambe; Fitness generale; Allenamento del portiere; Forza della presa; Miglioramento della presa; Forza della presa/delle mani; Battuta; Calcio e punting; Multiskill; Arbitraggio; Passaggio; Lancio; Reazione; Tempo di reazione; Ricezione e presa; Tiro; Snapping; Special team; Velocità e agilità; Allenamento della forza; Forza e condizionamento; Forza e resistenza; Altro
ja: トレーニング重点項目: 敏捷性; 敏捷性とスピード; バランスと安定性; ボールコントロール; ボール保持とグリップ; ブロッキングとタックル; 心肺持久力; キャッチング; 体幹コンディショニング; 守備; フラッグプリング; 柔軟性; フットワーク; 全般的なフィットネス; ゴールキーピング; 握力; グリップ強化; 握力 / 手の筋力; バッティング; キックとパント; マルチスキル; オフィシエイト / 審判; パス; ピッチング; リアクション; 反応時間; レシーブとキャッチ; シューティング; スナッピング; スペシャルチーム; スピードと敏捷性; ストレングストレーニング; 筋力とコンディショニング; 筋力とレジスタンス; その他
cs: Zaměření tréninku: Hbitost; Hbitost a rychlost; Rovnováha a stabilita; Kontrola míče; Držení míče; Blokování a skládání; Kardiovaskulární vytrvalost; Chytání; Posilování středu těla; Zpracování v poli; Strhávání vlajek; Flexibilita; Práce nohou; Celková kondice; Brankářský trénink; Síla úchopu; Zlepšení úchopu; Síla úchopu/ruky; Odpalování; Kopy ze země a z ruky; Více dovedností; Rozhodování; Přihrávky; Nadhazování; Reakce; Reakční doba; Zpracování a chytání; Střelba; Rozehrávky vzad (snap); Speciální týmy; Rychlost a hbitost; Silový trénink; Síla a kondice; Síla a odpor; Jiné
lt-LT: Treniruočių dėmesys: Vikrumas; Vikrumas ir greitis; Pusiausvyra ir stabilumas; Kamuolio valdymas; Kamuolio apsauga ir sukibimas; Blokavimas ir perėmimas; Širdies ir kraujagyslių ištvermė; Gaudymas; Korpuso raumenų stiprinimas; Žaidimas gynybos pozicijoje; Vėliavėlių traukimas; Lankstumas; Kojų darbas; Bendrasis fizinis pasirengimas; Vartininko įgūdžiai; Sukibimo jėga; Sukibimo gerinimas; Sukibimo / rankų jėga; Smūgiavimas; Spardymas iš eigos ir nuo žemės; Keli įgūdžiai; Teisėjavimas; Perdavimas; Padavimas; Reakcija; Reakcijos laikas; Priėmimas ir gaudymas; Metimas / smūgiavimas; Kamuolio padavimas atgal; Specialiosios komandos; Greitis ir vikrumas; Jėgos treniruotės; Jėga ir fizinis pasirengimas; Jėga ir pasipriešinimas; Kita
bg-BG: Тренировъчен фокус: Ловкост; Ловкост и скорост; Баланс и стабилност; Контрол над топката; Защита и захват на топката; Блокиране и спиране; Сърдечно-съдова издръжливост; Хващане; Тренировка за ядрото; Улавяне; Дърпане на флаг; Гъвкавост; Работа с крака; Обща физическа подготовка; Вратарски умения; Сила на захвата; Подобряване на захвата; Сила на захвата/ръцете; Удряне; Ритане и изритване от въздуха; Мултифункционални умения; Съдийство; Подаване; Хвърляне (пичинг); Реакция; Време за реакция; Поемане и хващане; Стрелба; Подаване (снап); Специални отбори; Скорост и ловкост; Силова тренировка; Сила и кондиция; Сила и съпротивление; Друго
de: Trainingsschwerpunkt: Agilität; Agilität und Schnelligkeit; Gleichgewicht & Stabilität; Ballkontrolle; Ballsicherheit und Griff; Blocken und Tackeln; Herz-Kreislauf-Ausdauer; Fangen; Rumpftraining; Fielding; Flag Pulling; Flexibilität; Beinarbeit; Allgemeine Fitness; Torwarttraining; Griffkraft; Griffverbesserung; Griff-/Handkraft; Schlagen; Kicking und Punting; Multi-Skill; Schiedsrichterwesen; Passspiel; Pitching; Reaktion; Reaktionszeit; Ballannahme und Fangen; Schießen; Snapping; Special Teams; Schnelligkeit & Agilität; Krafttraining; Kraft und Kondition; Kraft und Widerstand; Sonstige
sk-SK: Zameranie tréningu: Agilita; Agilita a rýchlosť; Rovnováha a stabilita; Ovládanie lopty; Bezpečnosť a držanie lopty; Blokovanie a skladanie; Kardiovaskulárna vytrvalosť; Chytanie; Posilňovanie stredu tela; Spracovanie v poli; Strhávanie vlajok; Flexibilita; Práca nôh; Celková kondícia; Brankárstvo; Sila úchopu; Zlepšenie úchopu; Sila úchopu/rúk; Pálkovanie; Kopanie a odkopávanie; Viacero zručností; Rozhodovanie; Prihrávanie; Nadhodenie; Reakcia; Reakčný čas; Prijímanie a chytanie; Streľba; Rozohrávka (snapping); Špeciálne tímy; Rýchlosť a agilita; Silový tréning; Sila a kondícia; Sila a odpor; Iné
da: Træningsfokus: Agility; Agility og fart; Balance og stabilitet; Boldkontrol; Boldsikkerhed og greb; Blokering og tackling; Kardiovaskulær udholdenhed; Gribning; Coretræning; Markspil; Flagtrækning; Fleksibilitet; Fodarbejde; Generel fitness; Målmandstræning; Grebstyrke; Forbedring af greb; Greb/håndstyrke; Slag; Spark og punting; Flere færdigheder; Dommerarbejde/dommer; Aflevering; Pitching; Reaktion; Reaktionstid; Modtagelse og gribning; Skud; Snapping; Special teams; Fart og agility; Styrketræning; Styrke- og konditionstræning; Styrke og modstand; Andet
ro-RO: Obiectivul antrenamentului: Agilitate; Agilitate și viteză; Echilibru și stabilitate; Controlul mingii; Siguranța mingii și aderență; Blocaj și deposedare; Rezistență cardiovasculară; Prindere; Antrenament pentru trunchi; Fielding; Smulgerea steagului; Flexibilitate; Joc de picioare; Fitness general; Portar; Forță de prindere; Îmbunătățirea prinderii; Forță prindere/mâini; Lovituri; Lovituri cu piciorul; Abilități multiple; Arbitraj; Pase; Aruncări; Reacție; Timp de reacție; Preluare și prindere; Șuturi/aruncări; Snapping; Echipe speciale; Viteză și agilitate; Antrenament de forță; Forță și condiționare; Forță și rezistență; Altele